Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2835.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 215.20, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 215.20. A. At the primaries and general elections held
in 1966, and each four (4) years thereafter, there shall be
nominated and elected in each and every district attorney's district
in the State of Oklahoma, a district attorney, who shall hold office
for a term of four (4) years, beginning on the first Monday of
January following his their election, and until his their successor
is elected and qualified.
B. District attorney elections shall be nonpartisan, and all
candidates shall file as independent candidates. No primary
Req. No. 11151 Page 1

elec tions shall be held in a nonpartisan election. Each candidate
shall appear on the ballot as an independent candidate without party
or other designation.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 19 O.S. 2021, Section 510, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 510. A. Any person, otherwise qualified, who has been
a resident of the State of Oklahoma for two (2) years, has been a
registered voter of the party whose nomination he or she seeks, or a
registered Independent, within the county from which such person
seeks election for the six (6) months next preceding the first day
of the filing period, is at least twenty-five (25) years of age next
preceding the date of filing for office, possesses at least a high
school education and has served as a duly certified peace officer,
in a full-time capacity, for a period of four (4) years or more
prior to the date of filing for the office of county sheriff, shall
be eligible to hold the office of county sheriff or to file
therefor. Within twelve (12) months of taking office, all newly
elected or appointed sheriffs shall complete a sheriff's
administrative school which has been developed by the Oklahoma
Sheriffs' Association and which has been approved by the Council on
Law Enforcement Education and Training (CLEET). Failure to complete
the sheriff's administrative school within the specified period
shall preclude the new sheriff from obtaining CLEET certification.
New sheriffs with prior CLEET certification, who fail to attend the
Req. No. 11151 Page 2

sher iff's administrative school, shall have their CLEET
certification revoked. Provided, however, the provisions of this
section relating to qualifications shall not apply to any person
serving as a county sheriff or to any person previously serving as
county sheriff prior to the adoption of this statute.
B. County sheriff elections shall be nonpartisan, and all
candidates shall file as independent candidates. No primary
elections shall be held in a nonpartisan election. Each candidate
shall appear on the ballot as an independent candidate without party
or other designation.
C. For purposes of this section, "peace officer" shall mean a
full-time duly appointed or elected officer who is paid for working
more than twenty-five (25) hours per week and whose duties are to
preserve the public peace, protect life and property, prevent crime,
serve warrants, and enforce state, federal or military laws and
local ordinances of this state or any political subdivision thereof.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11151 MJ 12/11/24





Req. No. 11151 Page 3